Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1594.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1798.3-E(d) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.550, No.54), is amended to read:Section 1798.3-E. Multimodal Transportation Fund.* * *[(d) Expiration.--This section shall expire December 31, 2025.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1594PN1906 - 2 - 123456789101112